Maryland, session 2026, HB0771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1–225.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCAL UNIVERSITY” MEANS A PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE WITH A PUBLIC
HEALTH, LAW, OR SOCIAL WORK PROGRAM.
(2) “LOCAL UNIVERSITY” INCLUDES A PROGRAM WITHIN AN
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, SUCH AS THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND SAFE CENTER FOR HUMAN
TRAFFICKING SURVIVORS.
(B) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD SHALL:
(1) ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ALLOW ALLOW AN APPLICANT
SEEKING LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE RENEWAL TO RECEIVE CONTINUING EDUCATION
CREDITS FOR COMPLETING A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING
PROGRAM DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 205 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) CONDUCT OUTREACH TO MAKE INDIVIDUALS REGULATED BY THE
BOARD AWARE OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING OPTIONS,
INCLUDING BY PROVIDING INFORMATION IN GENERAL BOARD COMMUNICATIONS
AND ON THE BOARD’S WEBSITE; AND
(3) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(C) A TRAINING PROGRAM FOR WHICH AN APPLICANT MAY RECEIVE
CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) BE APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN COLLABORATION WITH A
LOCAL UNIVERSITY AND IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND HUMAN
TRAFFICKING TASK FORCE AND ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE DIRECT SERVICES
TO HUMAN TRAFFICKING SURVIVORS;
(2) BE AT LEAST 1 HOUR IN DURATION;
(3) BE READILY ACCESSIBLE AND PROVIDED TO AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FREE OF CHARGE; AND
(4) INCLUDE INSTRUCTION ON:
(I) THE DEFINITIONS AND FORMS OF SEX AND LABOR
TRAFFICKING UNDER FEDERAL AND STATE LAW;
(II) AN UNDERSTANDING OF THE TRAUMA–INFORMED CARE
MODEL;
(III) THE PHYSICAL, BEHAVIORAL, AND EMOTIONAL
INDICATORS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING, PARTICULARLY THOSE PRESENTING IN A
HEALTH CARE SETTING;
(IV) APPROPRIATE SCREENING PROTOCOLS AND
DOCUMENTATION METHODS;
(V) MANDATORY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS UNDER STATE
LAW AND ESTABLISHED PROTOCOLS FOR REPORTING SUSPECTED CASES OF HUMAN
TRAFFICKING TO THE APPROPRIATE AUTHORITIES, INCLUDING THE NATIONAL
HUMAN TRAFFICKING HOTLINE; AND
(VI) AVAILABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL RESOURCES AND
SERVICES FOR SURVIVORS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 205
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of Health, in
collaboration and consultation with required stakeholders, shall approve the training
program required under § 1–225.1 of the Health Occupations Article, as enacted under
Section 1 of this Act.
(b) On or before October January 1, 2026 2027, each health occupations board
shall adopt the regulations necessary to carry out required under § 1–225.1(b)(3) of the
Health Occupations Article, as enacted by this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –